District of Columbia statutes.
9-1215.08

Repealed

Mayor to issue rules.

Repealed.

Apr. 30, 1998, D.C. Law 12-98, § 9, 45 DCR 1519
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-271, § 258, 62 DCR 1884
1981 Ed., § 7-238.
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 258 of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-481, Nov. 18, 2014, 61 DCR 12133, 20 STAT 4405).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 258 of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-7, Feb. 26, 2015, 62 DCR 2646, 21 STAT 807).
Delegation of authority under D.C. Law 12-98, the “Make A Difference Selection Committee Establishment Act of 1998”, see Mayor’s Order 99-193, November 23, 1999 ( 46 DCR 9972).